src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx ! 
trïblehkevoedtege:trïblehke#voedt BAARTEGE ;
aajege+Sem/Dummytag:aaj GAAJSEGE ;
aajege+CmpN/SgN+CmpNP/Pref+Sem/Dummytag:aaj GAAJSEGE ;
åårkege+Sem/Dummytag:åårk GAAJSEGE ;
jortege+Sem/Dummytag:jort GAAJSEGE ;
aalkoeåålmege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:aalkoe#åålm AAREGE ;
aarege+Sem/Dummytag:aar AAREGE ;
baartege+Sem/Dummytag:baart BAARTEGE ;
bahtsehke+Sem/Dummytag:bahtseh DEAKEHKE ;
beellege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:beell AAREGE ;
beetnege+Sem/Dummytag:beetn GAAJSEGE ;
bijjietjaalege+Sem/Dummytag:bijjie#tjaal AAREGE ;
baaltege+Sem/Dummytag:baalt AAREGE ;
byössege+Sem/Dummytag:byöss BAARTEGE ;
deakehke+Sem/Dummytag:deakah DEAKEHKE ;
deakehke+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:deahkah DEAKEHKE ;
eejhtege+Sem/Dummytag:eejht GAAJSEGE ;
duvtiebeetnege+Sem/Dummytag:duvtie#beetn GAAJSEGE ;
fielege+Sem/Dummytag:fieli AAREGE ;
fropmehke+Sem/Dummytag:fropmeh DEAKEHKE ;
gaajege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:gaaj AAREGE ;
gaajsege+Sem/Dummytag:gaajs GAAJSEGE ;
gaamege+Sem/Dummytag:gaam AAREGE "sko" ; ! gaamegisnie
goeksege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:goeks BAARTEGE ;
goelkegaamege+Sem/Dummytag:goelke#gaam AAREGE ;
guhkiestjaalege+Sem/Dummytag:guhkies#tjaal AAREGE ;
gïerege+Sem/Dummytag:gïer AAREGE ;
gïevege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:gïev GAAJSEGE ;
gïjmege+Sem/Dummytag:gïjm GAAJSEGE ;
gïjregaamege+Sem/Dummytag:gïjre#gaam AAREGE ;
hïejhtege+Sem/Dummytag:hïejht BAARTEGE ;
ingefæærenvoelege+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:ingefæren#voel AAREGE ;
ingefæærenvoelege+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:ingefææren#voel AAREGE ;
joksege+Sem/Dummytag:joks GAAJSEGE ;
jïelege+Sem/Dummytag:jïel GAAJSEGE ;
kultuvredoedtebeetnege+Sem/Dummytag:kultuvre#doedte#beetn GAAJSEGE ;
laadtege+Sem/Dummytag:laadt LAADTEGE ;
laejpietjaalege+Sem/Dummytag:laejpie#tjaal AAREGE ;
leejjege+Sem/Dummytag:leejj GAAJSEGE ;
leevege+Sem/Dummytag:leev GAAJSEGE ;
lotnege+Sem/Dummytag:lotn AAREGE ;
låavtege+Sem/Dummytag:låavt LAADTEGE ;
lïestege+Sem/Dummytag:lïest BAARTEGE ;
maadtege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:maadt GAAJSEGE ;
meessege+Sem/Dummytag:meess BAARTEGE ;
moehtege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:moeht BAARTEGE ;
neehlege+Sem/Dummytag:neehl BAARTEGE ;
njaarege+Sem/Dummytag:njaar AAREGE ;
njïetsege+Sem/Dummytag:njïets BAARTEGE ;
novsege+Sem/Dummytag:novs BAARTEGE ;
plïerehke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:plïereh DEAKEHKE ;
prïhtjege+Sem/Dummytag:prïhtj BAARTEGE ;
raamemaadtege+Sem/Dummytag:raame#maadt GAAJSEGE ;
raastege+Sem/Dummytag:raast GAAJSEGE ;
rïjhkeraastege+Sem/Dummytag:rïjhke#raast GAAJSEGE ; !raasteh-
ropmege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:ropm GAAJSEGE ;
rïeksege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:rïeks GAAJSEGE ;
rïevtege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:rïevt BAARTEGE ;
saadtege+Sem/Dummytag:saadt SAADTEGE ;
gaskesaadtege+Sem/Dummytag:gaske#saadt SAADTEGE ; ! e+Sem/Dummytag:mail
sihtege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:siht BAARTEGE ;
slïejhtege+Sem/Dummytag:slïejht GAAJSEGE ;
smaarege+Sem/Dummytag:smaar GAAJSEGE ;
soelege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:soel GAAJSEGE ;
spoejege+Sem/Dummytag:spoej BAARTEGE ;
deerpege+Sem/Dummytag:deerp BAARTEGE ;
steeblege+Sem/Dummytag:steebl GAAJSEGE ;
steeblege+Use/NG+Sem/Dummytag:stööbl GAAJSEGE ;
steebnege+Sem/Dummytag:steebn BAARTEGE ;
sïejpege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sïejp BAARTEGE ;
sïhtege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sïht BAARTEGE ;
sïlpebeetnege+Sem/Dummytag:sïlpe#beetn GAAJSEGE ;
tjaalege+Sem/Dummytag:tjaal AAREGE ;
tjaasmege+Sem/Dummytag:tjaasm BAARTEGE ;
tjaetsiegaamege+Sem/Dummytag:tjaetsie#gaam AAREGE ;
tjåerviemaadtege+Sem/Dummytag:tjåervie#maadt GAAJSEGE ;
tsegkiedeakehke+Sem/Dummytag:tsegkie#deakah DEAKEHKE ;
vaareslåavtege+Sem/Dummytag:vaares#låavt LAADTEGE ;
voedtege+Sem/Dummytag:voedt BAARTEGE ;
voelege+Sem/Dummytag:voel AAREGE ;
åålmege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:åålm AAREGE ;
